Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Conflict of Interest and Public Meetings.

Sec. 29.20.010.
Conflict of interest.

Each municipality shall adopt a conflict of interest ordinance that provides that

a member of the governing body shall declare a substantial financial interest the member has in an official action and ask to be excused from a vote on the matter;

the presiding officer shall rule on a request by a member of the governing body to be excused from a vote;

the decision of the presiding officer on a request by a member of the governing body to be excused from a vote may be overridden by the majority vote of the governing body; and

a municipal employee or official, other than a member of the governing body, may not participate in an official action in which the employee or official has a substantial financial interest.

If a municipality fails to adopt a conflict of interest ordinance by June 30, 1986, the provisions of this section are automatically applicable to and binding upon that municipality.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.020.
Meetings public.

Meetings of all municipal bodies shall be public as provided in AS

44.62.310

. The governing body shall provide reasonable opportunity for the public to be heard at regular and special meetings.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)